Nebraska, session 109, LB341.
Be it enacted by the people of the State of Nebraska,
Section 1. Sections 1 to 3 of this act shall be known and cited as the
Nebraska Statutory Thresholds for Settlements Involving Minors Act.
Sec. 2. The purpose of the Nebraska Statutory Thresholds for Settlements
Involving Minors Act is to set forth standards and procedures for settling
claims involving minors.
Sec. 3. (1) A person having legal custody of a minor may enter into a
settlement agreement with a person against whom the minor has a claim if:
(a) A conservator or guardian ad litem has not been appointed for the
minor;
(b) The total amount of the claim, not including reimbursement of medical
expenses, liens, reasonable attorney's fees and costs of suit, is forty
thousand dollars or less if paid in cash, by check, by draft, by direct
deposit, or by the purchase of a premium for an annuity;
(c) The money paid under the settlement agreement will be paid as set
forth in subsections (3) and (4) of this section; and
(d) The person entering into the settlement agreement on behalf of the
minor completes an affidavit or verified statement that attests that the person
has made a reasonable inquiry and that:
(i) To the best of the person's knowledge, the minor will be fully
compensated by the settlement; or
(ii) There is no practical way to obtain additional amounts from the party
entering into the settlement agreement with the minor.
(2) The attorney representing the person entering into the settlement
agreement on behalf of the minor, if any, shall maintain the affidavit or
verified statement completed under subdivision (1)(d) of this section in the
attorney's file for four years after the minor attains the age of twenty-one
years.
(3) The money payable under the settlement agreement shall be paid as
follows:
(a) If the minor or person entering into the settlement agreement on
behalf of the minor is represented by an attorney and the settlement is paid in
cash, by check, by draft, or by direct deposit, then payment shall be made into
the attorney's trust account maintained pursuant to the rules of the Supreme
Court to be held for the benefit of the minor. The attorney shall timely
deposit the money received on behalf of the minor directly into an account
established pursuant to the Nebraska Uniform Transfers to Minors Act for the
sole benefit of the minor that only allows withdrawals pursuant to subsection
(4) of this section and provide notice of the deposit to the minor and the
person entering into the settlement agreement on behalf of the minor. Notice
shall be delivered by personal service or first-class mail;
(b) If the minor or person entering into the settlement agreement on
behalf of the minor is not represented by an attorney and the settlement is
paid in cash, by check, by draft, or by direct deposit, then payment shall be
made into an account established pursuant to the Nebraska Uniform Transfers to
Minors Act for the sole benefit of the minor that only allows withdrawals
pursuant to subsection (4) of this section;
(c) If paid by the purchase of a premium for an annuity, then payment
shall be by direct payment to the provider of the annuity with the minor
designated as the sole beneficiary of the annuity; and
(d) If the minor is a ward of the state and the settlement is paid in
cash, by check, by draft, or by direct deposit, then payment shall be made into
a trust account, or subaccount of a trust account, established by the
Department of Health and Human Services for the purpose of receiving money
payable to the ward under the settlement agreement and that earns interest for
the benefit of the ward and the department shall provide notice of the deposit
to the ward by personal service or first-class mail.
(4) The money in the minor's savings account, trust account, or trust
subaccount described in subsection (3) of this section shall not be withdrawn,
removed, or paid out or transferred to any person, including the minor, except
as follows:
(a) Pursuant to court order;
(b) At the direction of the custodian for the account established pursuant
to the Nebraska Uniform Transfers to Minors Act for the sole benefit of the
minor;
(c) Upon the minor's attainment of nineteen years of age; or
(d) Upon the minor's death.
(5) If a settlement agreement is entered into in compliance with
subsection (1) of this section, the signature of the person entering into the
settlement agreement on behalf of the minor is binding on the minor without the
-1-

LB341 LB341
2025 2025
need for further court approval or review and has the same force and effect as
if the minor were a competent adult entering into the settlement agreement.
(6)(a) A person acting in good faith on behalf of a minor under this
section is not liable to the minor for the money paid in settlement or for any
other claim arising out of the settlement.
(b) An insurer who in good faith transfers funds at the direction of the
settling minor or the minor's representatives into a restrictive savings or
other restrictive investment account or to purchase an annuity, shall not be
liable to the minor or the minor's representatives for any claims arising from
the use of those funds after the transfer is completed.
(c) A financial institution who in good faith opens a restricted savings
or other restricted investment account at the direction of the minor or the
minor's representatives shall not be liable to the minor or the minor's
representatives for any claims arising from the use of such funds.
(7) Any person against whom a minor has a claim that settles the claim
with a minor in good faith under this section shall not be liable to the minor
for any claims arising from the settlement of the claim.
(8) For the purposes of this section, minor means a person under nineteen
years of age.
(9) Nothing in this section shall prevent anyone acting on behalf of the
minor from filing for guardianship, limited guardianship, or conservatorship in
the appropriate county court and requesting the county court to approve the
settlement on behalf of the minor and oversee the settlement proceeds.
-2-